Louisiana, session 2026, SB192.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The introductory paragraph of R.S. 22:1157(D)(2) is hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 22:1157(A)(6) and (D)(2)(c) and (4) are hereby enacted to read as
follows:
§1157. Dental reimbursement or payments
A. As used in this Section, the following definitions shall apply:
* * *
(6) "Express acceptance" means a clear and direct agreement to a
selected payment method, signifying acceptance of the payment method without
any ambiguity or implied actions. Express acceptance may be given
electronically, and can include an electronic or digital signature or by checking
a box indicating express acceptance and acceptance of a selected payment
method.
* * *
D.(1) * * *
(2) If initiating or changing payments to a dentist using electronic funds
transfers or credit card payments, a dental plan shall do both all of the following:
* * *
(c) Obtain from the provider or a designee of the provider an election,
through express acceptance, to accept a payment of the claim using the credit
card or electronic funds transfer payment methodology.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 192 ENROLLED
* * *
(4) Violation of the express acceptance required as provided in
Paragraph (2) of this Subsection nullifies any election on claim payment
methodology until such time as a new express agreement is executed.
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall become operative on January 1, 2027, and
apply to any policy, contract, program, or dental coverage plan issued, amended, or renewed
on or after January 1, 2027. Any policy, contract, or dental coverage plan in effect prior to
January 1, 2027, shall convert to conform to the provisions of this Act no later than January
1, 2028.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor, or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.